Indiana, session 2026, SB125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 33-28-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) All circuit courts have:
(1) original and concurrent jurisdiction in all civil cases and in all
criminal cases;
(2) original and concurrent jurisdiction with the superior courts in
all user fee cases;
(3) de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals from city and town
courts; and
(4) in Marion County, de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals
from township small claims courts established under IC 33-34 but
not jurisdiction over a case that must originate in the Marion
County small claims court under IC 33-34-3-3.
(b) The circuit court also has the appellate jurisdiction that may be
conferred by law upon it.
SECTION 2. IC 33-29-1-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 125—LS 6305/DI 149


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. All standard superior courts have:
(1) original and concurrent jurisdiction in all civil cases and in all
criminal cases;
(2) original and concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit courts in
all user fee cases;
(3) de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals from city and town
courts; and
(4) in Marion County, de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals
from township small claims courts established under IC 33-34 but
not jurisdiction over a case that must originate in the Marion
County small claims court under IC 33-34-3-3.
SECTION 3. IC 33-29-1.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2019,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. All superior courts have:
(1) original and concurrent jurisdiction in all civil cases and in all
criminal cases;
(2) original and concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit courts in
all user fee cases;
(3) de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals from city and town
courts; and
(4) in Marion County, de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals
from township small claims courts established under IC 33-34 but
not jurisdiction over a case that must originate in the Marion
County small claims court under IC 33-34-3-3.
SECTION 4. IC 33-31-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2011,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. All probate courts have:
(1) original and concurrent jurisdiction in all civil cases and in all
criminal cases;
(2) de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals from city and town
courts; and
(3) in Marion County, de novo appellate jurisdiction of appeals
from township small claims courts established under IC 33-34 but
not jurisdiction over a case that must originate in the Marion
County small claims court under IC 33-34-3-3.
SECTION 5. IC 33-34-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.125-2021,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The court has original and concurrent
jurisdiction with the circuit and superior courts in possessory actions
between landlord and tenant in which the past due rent at the time of
filing does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The court also
has original and concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and superior
2026 IN 125—LS 6305/DI 149


courts in actions for the possession of property where the value of the
property sought to be recovered does not exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000). These jurisdictional limitations are not affected by interest
and attorney's fees.
2026 IN 125—LS 6305/DI 149